Utah statutes.
31A-40-206.   Professional employer service not insurance.
(1)  A professional employer organization licensed under this chapter is not
considered
engaged in the sale of insurance or as acting as a third party administrator
when the professional employer organization engages in one or more of the
following with respect to a professional employer service:
(a)  offering;
(b)  marketing;
(c)  selling;
(d)  administering; or
(e)  providing.
(2)  Subsection (1) applies to a professional employer service that includes
an employee benefit plan for a covered employee.
